Washington statutes.
RCW 4.12.080

Change by stipulation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 4.12.030 all the parties to the action by stipulation in writing or by consent in open court entered in the records may agree that the place of trial be changed to any county of the state, and thereupon the court must order the change agreed upon.

[Code 1881 s 55; 1877 p 13 s 56; RRS s 216.]